Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
CONTROL OF WATER POLLUTION AND SURFACE-WATER USE

Cross references.

- Anti-siphon devices for irrigation systems,

§

2-1-4

.

Regulation of solid waste handling and disposal facilities,

§

12-8-20

et seq.

Littering waters,

§

16-7-43

.

Authority of municipal corporations and counties to enter into contracts relating to provision of industrial wastewater treatment services,

§

36-60-2

.

Licensing of water and wastewater treatment plant operators and laboratory analysts, T. 43, C. 51.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Water quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-6.

Law reviews.

-
For article discussing federal liability for pollution abatement in condemnation actions, see 17 Mercer L. Rev. 364 (1966). For article, "Georgia's Environmental Law: A Survey," see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 633 (1972). For article discussing the permit system under the Georgia Water Quality Control Act, requiring authorization for the construction of pollutant discharge facilities, see 11 Ga. St. B.J. 176 (1975). For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987). For annual survey on environmental law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 1133 (2018).
For note comparing 1964 Water Quality Control Act to similar provisions of 1957 Act and suggesting some amendatory legislation, see 16 Mercer L. Rev. 469 (1965). For notes, "Regulation and Ownership of the Marshlands: The Georgia Marshlands Act," see 5 Ga. L. Rev. 563 (1971).
For comment, "Trading Water:
Using Tradable Permits to Promote Conservation and Efficient Allocation of an Increasingly Scarce Resource," see 59 Emory L.J.
1001 (2010). For comment, "The Right to Rainwater: An Unlikely Fairy Tale," see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 575 (2018). For comment, "Uncontainable Threat: The Nation's Coal Ash Ponds," see 69 Emory L.J. 163 (2019).

12-5-20. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Water Quality Control Act."

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Law reviews.

-
For article examining approach to water pollution control established by the Georgia Water Quality Control Act and other regulations in light of alternative approaches, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972). For article, "Sharing Water Through Interbasin Transfer and Basis of Origin Protection in Georgia: Issues for Evaluation in Comprehensive State Water Planning for Georgia's Surface Water Rivers and Groundwater Aquifers," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (2004). For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 477 (2006). For annual survey on administrative law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2018). For article, "Integrated Water Resources Management and Effective Intergovernmental Cooperation on Watershed Issues," see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 399 (2019).
For comment, "Trading Water:
Using Tradable Permits to Promote Conservation and Efficient Allocation of an Increasingly Scarce Resource," see 59 Emory L.J.
1001 (2010).

12-5-21. Declaration of policy; legislative intent.

The people of the State of Georgia are dependent upon the rivers, streams, lakes, and subsurface waters of the state for public and private water supply and for agricultural, industrial, and recreational uses. It is therefore declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia that the water resources of the state shall be utilized prudently for the maximum benefit of the people, in order to restore and maintain a reasonable degree of purity in the waters of the state and an adequate supply of such waters, and to require where necessary reasonable usage of the waters of the state and reasonable treatment of sewage, industrial wastes, and other wastes prior to their discharge into such waters. To achieve this end, the government of the state shall assume responsibility for the quality and quantity of such water resources and the establishment and maintenance of a water quality and water quantity control program adequate for present needs and designed to care for the future needs of the state, provided that nothing contained in this article shall be construed to waive the immunity of the state for any purpose.

The achievement of the purposes described in subsection (a) of this Code section requires that the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources be charged with the duty described in that subsection, and that it have the authority to regulate the withdrawal, diversion, or impoundment of the surface waters of the state, and to require the use of reasonable methods after having considered the technical means available for the reduction of pollution and economic factors involved to prevent and control the pollution of the waters of the state.

Further, it is the intent of this article to establish within the executive branch of the government administrative facilities and procedures for determining improper usage of the surface waters of the state and pollution of the waters of the state, and to confer discretionary administrative authority upon the Environmental Protection Division to take these and related circumstances into consideration in its decisions and actions in determining, under the conditions and specific cases, those procedures which will best protect the public interest.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 629, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 368, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, the hyphen in "subsurface" was deleted in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

-
For article examining approach to water pollution control established by the Georgia Water Quality Control Act and other regulations in light of alternative approaches, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972).
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-5-22. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Effluent limitation" means any restriction or prohibition established under this article on quantities, rates, or concentrations, or a combination thereof, of chemical, physical, biological, or other constituents which are discharged from point sources into the water of the state, including, but not limited to, schedules of compliance.

"Industrial wastes" means any liquid, solid, or gaseous substance, or combination thereof, resulting from a process of industry, manufacture, or business or from the development of any natural resources.

"Nonpoint source" means any source which discharges pollutants into the waters of the state other than a point source.

"Other wastes" means liquid, gaseous, or solid substances, except industrial wastes and sewage, which may cause or tend to cause pollution of any waters of the state.

"Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, or other unincorporated association. This term may extend and be applied to bodies politic and corporate.

"Point source" means any discernible, confined, or discrete conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel, conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, concentrated animal feeding operation, or vessel or other floating craft, from which pollutants are or may be discharged.

"Pollutant" means dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue, sewage, garbage, sewage sludge, munitions, chemical wastes, biological materials, radioactive materials, heat, wrecked or discarded equipment, rock, sand, cellar dirt, industrial wastes, municipal waste, and agricultural waste discharged into the waters of the state. It does not mean (A) sewage from vessels or (B) water, gas, or other material which is injected into a well to facilitate production of oil or gas, or water derived in association with oil or gas production and disposed of in a well, if the well, used either to facilitate production or for disposal purposes, is approved by the appropriate authorities of this state, and if such authorities determine that such injection or disposal will not result in degradation of ground-water or surface-water resources.

"Pollution" means the manmade or man-induced alteration of the chemical, physical, biological, and radiological integrity of water.

"Sewage" means the water carried waste products or discharges from human beings or from the rendering of animal products, or chemicals or other wastes from residences, public or private buildings, or industrial establishments, together with such ground, surface, or storm water as may be present.

"Sewage system" means sewage treatment works, pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other constructions, devices, and appliances appurtenant thereto, used for conducting sewage or industrial wastes or other wastes to the point of ultimate disposal.

"Waters" or "waters of the state" means any and all rivers, streams, creeks, branches, lakes, reservoirs, ponds, drainage systems, springs, wells, and all other bodies of surface or subsurface water, natural or artificial, lying within or forming a part of the boundaries of the state which are not entirely confined and retained completely upon the property of a single individual, partnership, or corporation.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 629, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 3; Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was inserted following "partnership" in the first sentence of paragraph (7), former designations (1) and (2) were redesignated as present designations (A) and (B) in paragraph (9), and a hyphen was deleted from "water carried" in paragraph (11).

Law reviews.

-
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972).

12-5-23. Powers and duties of board and director as to control of water pollution and surface-water use generally.

In the performance of its duties, the board shall have and may exercise the power to:

Adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this article as the board may deem necessary to provide for the control and management of water pollution and surface water use to protect the environment and the health of humans. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to this state as a whole, may vary from area to area, or may vary according to the characteristics of the water pollutants, as may be appropriate, to facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this article. The rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Prescribing the procedure to be followed in applying for permits and requiring the submission of such plans, specifications, verifications, and other pertinent information deemed relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits;

Establishing or revising standards of water purity for any of the waters of the state, specifying the maximum degree of pollution permissible in accordance with the public interest in water supply; the conservation of fish, game, and aquatic life; and agricultural, industrial, and recreational uses;

Governing water use classifications and water quality standards;

Governing any marine toilet, marine sanitation device, or other disposal unit located on or within a boat operated on waters of the state;

Establishing procedures for dealing with emergency situations and spills which endanger the waters of the state;

Providing minimum standards for treatment of discharges; providing uniform procedures and practices to be followed relating to the application for issuance, modification, revocation and reissuance, and termination of permits for the discharge of any pollutant into the waters of the state;

Providing for permissible limits of surface water usage for both consumptive and nonconsumptive purposes and providing permits to withdraw, divert, or impound surface waters;

Providing minimum standards for waste-water pretreatment required and the uniform procedures and practices to be followed relating to the application for and the issuance or revocation of pretreatment permits for the discharge of any pollutant into a publicly owned treatment works and then into the waters of the state, and providing requirements for approval and implementation of publicly owned treatment works pretreatment programs and for administration of pretreatment programs;

Providing for uniform procedures and practices to be followed for the determination of categorization of industrial users and requests for variances for fundamentally different factors;

Providing minimum standards of pollutant treatment required and uniform procedures and practices to be followed relating to the application for and the issuance, modification, amendment, or revocation of permits for the discharge of pollutants into land disposal or land treatment systems and then into the waters of the state;

Establishing classifications for waste-water treatment plants;

Providing uniform practices and procedures to be followed relating to the application for and the issuance, modification, amendment, or revocation of permits for the discharge of pollutants into underground injection wells;

Providing for the administration and operation of the State Revolving Loan Fund;

Providing standards for treatment of discharges; providing uniform procedures and practices to be followed relating to the application for issuance, modification, revocation and reissuance, and termination of general permits for the discharge of any pollutant to the waters of the state;

Providing for the uniform procedures and practices to be followed relating to the application for issuance, modification, revocation and reissuance, and termination of permits for the discharge of any storm water into the waters of the state;

Establishing requirements for the beneficial use of sewage sludge through land application, including pollutant limits, pathogen and vector attraction reduction requirements, operational standards, management practices, monitoring, recordkeeping, reporting, and permitting requirements;

Providing for rules and regulations for land disposal;

Providing for matters necessary to carry out the purposes and requirements of this article and relating to the state's participation in the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System established under the federal Water Pollution Control Act; and

Establishing requirements for units of local government which have waste-water discharge permits that allow a discharge of at least one million gallons per day to submit to the director for approval watershed assessments and watershed protection plans for areas within their political boundaries and for implementation of such plans;

Within one year from April 1, 1996, the board shall by rule establish water quality standards for turbidity applicable to all waters of the state, taking into account the recommendations of the academic panel established under the Interim Report of the Senate Storm-water Study Committee created by Senate Resolution 252 (1993) and interested parties;

Take all necessary steps to ensure the effective enforcement of this article;

By July 1, 2002, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations which:

Establish acceptable sampling methods and analytical standards for water quality samples collected and reported by any person to the division for its use in listing or delisting impaired waters pursuant to the state's responsibilities under Sections 303(d) and 305(b) of the federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. Sections 1313(d) and 1315(b), respectively, as now or hereafter amended; and

Establish acceptable sampling methods and analytical standards for measuring salinity in coastal waters and defining the zones where salt, fresh, and brackish waters mix; and

By December 31, 2003, the board shall promulgate rules and regulations which establish a fee system designed to offset the costs of the state-wide implementation of the National Pollution Discharge Elimination System general permit or permits for storm-water runoff from construction activities as is now in effect or as may be amended or reissued in the future pursuant to the state's authority to implement the same through federal delegation under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251, et seq., and subsection (f) of Code Section 12-5-30.

Fees established by the board under this paragraph shall be no less than that which is required to properly administer Chapter 7 of this title, provided that such fees shall not exceed $80.00 per acre of land-disturbing activity as defined in Code Section 12-7-3.

In the performance of his or her duties, the director may:

Conduct or cooperate in research for the purpose of developing economical and practicable methods of preventing and controlling pollution;

Cooperate with agencies of the federal government and with other agencies of the state and political subdivisions thereof;

Enter into agreements and compacts with other states, and with the United States, relative to the prevention and control of pollution in any state waters and on water quality matters, in accordance with the Constitution and statutes of Georgia;

Receive, accept, hold, and use on behalf of the state, and for purposes provided for in this article, gifts, grants, donations, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property of every kind and description; and

At the discretion of the director, give instruction and training to waste-water treatment plant operators and waste-water laboratory analysts; provide technical assistance for such instruction and training by others; collect fees for such training and assistance in accordance with Code Section 45-12-92; purchase the services of any person to render such instruction and training; and make available to any such person suitable space and facilities for the rendering of such instruction and training. The division may collect from the participants in any such instructional or training program a pro rata share of any actual out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the division in producing such program including, without limitation, the rental of nonagency facilities and the payment of nonagency instructors.

In the performance of his or her duties, the director shall:

Exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this article and all rules, regulations, and orders promulgated hereunder;

Act in the interest of the people of the state to restore and maintain a reasonable degree of purity in the waters of the state;

Encourage voluntary cooperation by all persons in the state in restoring and maintaining a reasonable degree of purity in the waters of the state;

Survey the waters of the state to determine the extent, character, and effects of existing conditions of pollution;

Prepare and develop a general comprehensive plan for the prevention of any further pollution and reduction of existing pollution after a thorough study of existing practices and available research;

Administer and enforce the laws of the state relating to the prevention and control of pollution;

Hold hearings to determine whether or not an alleged pollution is contrary to the public interest;

Adopt rules and procedures for the conduct of meetings and hearings. In all hearings relative to violations, or for other procedures under this article, the rules of evidence shall be followed;

Establish or revise standards of water purity for any of the waters of this state, which specify the maximum degree of pollution permissible in accordance with the public interest in water supply; the conservation of fish, game, and aquatic life; and agricultural, industrial, and recreational uses. Prior to establishing or revising the standards of water purity, the division shall consider the technical means available for the reduction of pollution and the economic factors involved;

Require any marine toilet or other disposal unit located on or within any boat operated on waters of this state to have securely affixed to the interior discharge toilet or unit a suitable treatment device in operating condition, constructed and fastened in accordance with regulations of the division, or some other treatment or facility or method authorized by regulation of the division. All sewage passing into or through the marine toilet or units shall pass solely through such device. All boats located upon the waters of this state are subject to inspection by the division or its duly authorized agents at any time for the purpose of determining compliance with this paragraph, provided that this paragraph does not apply to ocean-going vessels of 20 tons displacement or more;

Make investigations and inspections to ensure compliance with this article, the rules and regulations issued pursuant hereto, and any orders that the division may adopt or issue;

Issue an order or orders directing any particular person or persons to secure within the time specified therein such operating results as are reasonable and practicable of attainment toward the control, abatement, and prevention of pollution of the waters of the state and the preservation of the necessary quality for the reasonable use thereof;

Establish or revise through rules and regulations of the Board of Natural Resources or permit conditions, or both, effluent limitations based upon an assessment of technology and processes unrelated to the quality of the receiving waters of this state;

Establish or revise through rules and regulations of the Board of Natural Resources or permit conditions, or both, permissible limits of surface-water usage for both consumptive and nonconsumptive purposes;

Perform any and all acts and exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes and requirements of this article and of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251, et seq., relating to this state's participation in the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System established under that act and shall administer the fee program established by the board pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section;

Establish the standards for water plans prepared by the Metropolitan North Georgia Planning District and certify such plans as consistent or inconsistent with such standards. Such standards shall include but shall not be limited to the following objectives: maintaining water quality in all streams and public lakes that meet state water quality standards; improving water quality in all streams and public lakes that do not meet state water quality standards; and maintaining appropriate levels of stream flow downstream of new or expanding surface-water withdrawal facilities; and

Provide an annual accounting for all transfers of water exceeding an annualized one million gallons per day from one major river drainage basin or subsurface supply aquifer to another. To the extent possible, the director shall use information derived from permits issued by the director pursuant to Code Sections 12-5-30 and 12-5-31, together with any supporting documentation, to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph.

If the director has reasonable cause to believe that an applicant for a permit under this article to discharge pollutants who has less than three years of compliance history in this state is not in compliance with laws or permits, then, the director is authorized to require the applicant to submit, at the time of application, a compliance history disclosure form prepared by the department. The form shall include a statement to the effect that neither the applicant nor, in the case of a corporation or partnership, an officer, director, manager, partner, or shareholder of 5 percent or more of the stock or financial interest in such corporation or partnership has been convicted of a felony or been adjudicated in contempt of court as described in this subsection. Such form shall also require a listing of the names, social security numbers, taxpayer identification numbers, and business addresses of the applicant or, in the case of a corporation or partnership, its officers, directors, managers, partners, or shareholders of 5 percent or more of the stock or financial interest in such corporation or partnership, along with a description of any offenses identified by this subsection. The director may refuse to issue permits under this article for the discharge of pollutants to persons with less than three years of compliance history in this state if the director finds by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant for such a permit or, in the case of a corporation or partnership, an officer, director, manager, partner, or shareholder of 5 percent or more of the stock or financial interest in such corporation or partnership:

Has intentionally misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the application submitted to the director;

Has obtained or attempted to obtain another permit from the director by misrepresentation or concealment;

Has pleaded guilty or been convicted by final judgment, and all appeals have been exhausted, in this state or any other state or federal court of any felony involving moral turpitude within the three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Has pleaded guilty or been convicted by final judgment and all appeals have been exhausted to a third or subsequent material violation of any federal environmental law or any environmental law of this state or of any other state that presented a substantial endangerment to human health or the environment within three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Has been adjudicated in contempt of any court order enforcing any federal environmental laws or any environmental laws of this state or of any other state within three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Was the holder of any permit required for the discharge of pollutants, as defined by this article, under the laws of this state, any other state, or the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, as amended, which permit has been revoked for reasons of noncompliance within three years preceding the date of the application for a permit under this article; or

Was denied for reasons of noncompliance the issuance of any permit required for the discharge of pollutants, as defined by this article, under the laws of this state, any other state, or the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, as amended, within three years preceding the date of the application for a permit under this article.

The director is authorized to refuse to issue permits under this article for the discharge of pollutants to persons with three or more years of compliance history in this state if the director finds by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant for such a permit or, in the case of a corporation or partnership, an officer, director, manager, partner, or shareholder of 5 percent or more of the stock or financial interest in such corporation or partnership:

Has intentionally misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the application submitted to the director;

Has obtained or attempted to obtain another permit from the director by misrepresentation or concealment;

Has pleaded guilty or been convicted by final judgment, and all appeals have been exhausted, in this state of any felony involving moral turpitude within three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Has pleaded guilty or been convicted by final judgment, and all appeals have been exhausted, to a third or subsequent material violation of any environmental law of this state that presented a substantial endangerment to human health or the environment within three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Has been adjudicated in contempt of any court order enforcing any environmental laws of this state within the three years preceding the date of the application for such a permit;

Was the holder of any permit required for the discharge of pollutants under this article and such permit has been revoked for reasons of noncompliance within three years preceding the date of application for a permit under this article; or

Was denied for reasons of noncompliance the issuance of any permit required for the discharge of pollutants, as defined by this article, under the laws of this state within three years preceding the date of the application for a permit under this article.

The director shall not refuse to issue a permit based upon the information required under subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section if the director finds that affirmative actions taken by the applicant mitigate the impact of any such material misrepresentations, concealment, convictions, or adjudication. Such affirmative actions to be considered by the director as mitigating factors shall include, but not be limited to, information or documentation related to the following:

Implementation by the applicant of formal policies, training programs, or other management controls to minimize the occurrence of future unlawful activities;

Installation by the applicant of environmental auditing or compliance programs; or

The discharge from employment of any individual who was convicted of a crime as described in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section.

The director shall make separately stated findings of fact to support a written determination made under subsections (d), (e), and (f) of this Code section. The findings of ultimate fact contained in such written determination must be accompanied by a concise statement of the underlying basic facts of record to support the findings.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 629, § 4; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, §§ 5, 24; Ga. L. 1966, p. 316, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1517, 1534; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1266, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 368, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 305, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 255, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1644, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 115, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 892, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, §§ 2, 3.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, "National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System" was substituted for "national pollutant discharge elimination system" in the middle of paragraph (b)(15) (now paragraph (c)(15)).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, in subsection (a), "article" was substituted for "part" twice in paragraph (a)(1) and once in paragraph (a)(3); a comma was deleted following "revocation" in subparagraph (a)(1)(N); "storm water" was substituted for "stormwater" in subparagraph (a)(1)(O); "April 1, 1996" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in paragraph (a)(2); and "ensure" was substituted for "insure" in paragraph (a)(3).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, in subsection (c), paragraph (c)(16) as enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 892,

§

3, was redesignated as paragraph (c)(17), a semicolon was substituted for the period at the end of paragraph (c)(15) and "; and" was added at the end of paragraph (c)(16).

U.S. Code.

- The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1251 et seq. The National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System, referred to in this Code section, is established by 33 U.S.C.

§

1342.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Water quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-6.

Law reviews.

-
For article criticizing impressionistic approach to water use classification established by permit system, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972).
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972). For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A.

§

12-5-23

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 13 (2001). For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 244 (2003).

12-5-23.1. Water quality standards for lakes; monitoring; studies and reports; development, approval, and publication of water quality standards.

As used in this Code section, the word "lake" means any publicly owned lake or reservoir located wholly or partially within this state which has a normal pool level surface average of 1,000 or more acres.

The director shall establish water quality standards for each lake which require the lake to be safe and suitable for fishing and swimming and for use as a public water supply, unless a use attainability analysis conducted within requirements of this article demonstrates such standards are unattainable.

For purposes of this subsection, a multiple parameter approach for lake water quality standards shall be adopted. Numerical criteria including, but not limited to, those listed below shall be adopted for each lake:

pH (maximum and minimum);

Fecal coliform bacteria;

Chlorophyll a for designated areas determined as necessary to protect a specific use;

Total nitrogen;

Total phosphorus loading for the lake in pounds per acre feet per year; and

Dissolved oxygen in the epilimnion during periods of thermal stratification.

The standards for water quality of each lake shall take into account the geographic location of the lake within the state and the location of the lake within its watershed as well as horizontal and vertical variations of hydrological conditions within each lake. The director shall also establish nutrient limits for each of the lakes' major tributary streams, including streams with permitted discharges. Such limits shall be consistent with the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section and shall be established on the basis of accepted limnological techniques and as necessary in accordance with the legal and technical principles for total maximum daily loads. The nutrient limits for tributary streams shall be established at the same time that the lake water quality standards are established.

After water quality standards are established for each lake and its tributary streams, the division shall monitor each lake on a regular basis to ensure that the lake reaches and maintains such standards.

The data from such monitoring shall be public information. The director shall have the authority to close a swimming area if data from samplings indicates, in the opinion of the director, that such action is necessary for public safety.

Provided funds are available from any source, there shall be a comprehensive study of each lake prior to adopting lake water quality standards for the lake. Study components and procedures will be established after consultation with local officials and affected organizations. The comprehensive study for Lake Sidney Lanier, Lake Walter F. George, and West Point Lake shall be initiated during 1990. At least three comprehensive studies for remaining lakes shall be initiated in each subsequent year. The duration of each study shall not exceed two years. A scientific report on each comprehensive study shall be published within 180 days after the completion of the study. Draft recommendations for numerical criteria for each of the water quality parameters will be simultaneously published, taking into account the scientific findings. A public notice of the draft recommendations, including a copy of the recommendations, will be made available to the public. Public notice in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," shall be provided for such recommendations. The notice shall be made available at least 30 days prior to board action in a regional public library or county courthouse. The recommendation will be provided to persons submitting a written request. A comment period of not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days will be provided.

The director or the director's designee shall conduct a public hearing within the above-referenced comment period in the vicinity of the lake before the final adoption of lake water quality standards for the lake. The director shall announce the date, time, place, and purpose of the public hearing at least 30 days prior to the hearing. A ten-day period subsequent to the hearing will be allowed for additional public comment.

The Department of Natural Resources will evaluate the comments received during the comment period and during the public hearing and will then develop recommended final standards and criteria for submission to the Board of Natural Resources for consideration and approval.

The final recommendations of the director for lake water quality standards shall be made to the Board of Natural Resources within 60 days after the close of the comment period subsequent to the public hearing provided for in subsection (h) of this Code section. The standards, with such modifications as the board may determine, shall be considered for adoption by the Board of Natural Resources within 60 days after receiving the recommendations from the director. Such standards shall be published by the department and made available to all interested local government officials and citizens of the area served by the lake.

At the discretion of the director, comment periods and deadlines set forth above may be extended, but in no circumstance shall more than one year elapse between the completion of the lake study and the adoption of the final recommendations.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-23.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1207, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1990 enactment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 221 (1990).